District of Columbia statutes.
31-2602.04

Repealed

Organization and licensing requirements for domestic mutual companies.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 404, ch. 93, title II, § 4
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330
1981 Ed., § 35-1404.
1973 Ed., § 35-1104.